Washington statutes.
RCW 18.06.120

Compliance with administrative procedures—Fees.

(1) Every person licensed under this chapter shall comply with the administrative procedures and administrative requirements for registration and renewal set by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

(2) All fees collected under this section and *RCW 18.06.070 shall be credited to the health professions account as required under RCW 43.70.320.

[ 2010 c 286 s 7; 1996 c 191 s 3; 1995 c 323 s 10; 1992 c 110 s 4; 1991 c 3 s 12; 1985 c 326 s 12.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 18.06.070 was repealed by 2019 c 308 s 24.